Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB396.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1204.4. Emergency Certification Applicants for Career and Technical Education Certification.--(a) The Department of Education shall issue a Career and Technical Instructional I Certificate to a candidate who satisfies one of the following:(1) the candidate holds a valid and current career and technical instructional certificate or equivalent certificate issued by another state and meets all of the requirements under 1234567891011121314151617181920 22 Pa. Code § 49.12 (relating to eligibility); or(2) the candidate has completed a minimum of four (4) years of wage-earning experience in the occupation to be taught, the candidate holds current and valid nationally recognized accreditation certifications within the desired subject area and the candidate meets all requirements in 22 Pa. Code § 49.12.(b) A Career and Technical Instructional I Certificate issued under subsection (a) shall be valid for eight (8) annual school terms and shall be converted to a Career and Technical Instructional II Certificate in accordance with 22 Pa. Code § 49.143 (relating to Career and Technical Instructional II) if the candidate has at least two (2) years of classroom teaching experience and provides evidence of satisfactory professional educator performance for the candidate's two (2) most recent years of classroom teaching.(c) A candidate who is seeking a Career and Technical Instructional I Certificate and meets the requirements of subsection (a) shall be issued a Career and Technical Instructional I Certificate on an expedited basis in accordance with this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0396PN0361 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021